Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 11 Administration
§ 39-11-102.1.
Administration; state board of equalization.

The governor shall appoint, with senate confirmation, three (3) persons who shall constitute the state board of equalization who are the department’s board of appeals. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the board members may be members of the same political party. Each appointment of the board members shall be for a six (6) year term.

The board shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman who shall serve for two (2) years.

The state board of equalization shall perform the duties specified in article 15, section 10 of the Wyoming constitution and shall hear appeals from county boards of equalization and review final decisions of the department upon application of any interested person adversely affected, including boards of county commissioners for the purposes of this subsection, under the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Upon request of a county board of equalization providing compelling reasons to do so, the state board of equalization may accept a case certified directly to the state board of equalization pursuant to rules adopted by the state board of equalization. The state board of equalization shall accept a case certified directly to the state board of equalization that involves property that may subject a county to tax liability as provided in W.S. 39-13-102(c)(iv). The board shall also review final decisions of the department of transportation concerning the assessment or application of taxes authorized under this title upon application of any interested person adversely affected. Any interested person adversely affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a) shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the board. In addition, the board shall:

Manage its internal affairs and prescribe rules of practice and procedure;

Prescribe the form for the abstract of the assessment roll, examine and compare the abstracts of the counties and equalize the same, so that all taxable property in the state is assessed at its fair market value, and to that end shall add to or deduct from the aggregate valuation of the property, or any class or classes of property, in any county such percent as will bring the same to its fair market value. When any assessed valuation is to be increased or decreased, the board shall provide not less than twenty (20) days notice of the proposed action to the county board of equalization and county assessor of the county in which the property is situated. If requested, the state board of equalization shall provide an opportunity for a hearing for the county board of equalization and assessor of the affected county. The hearing shall be held in the affected county. After a hearing, if requested, the county board of equalization shall take the necessary action to effectuate the action taken by the state board of equalization. The state board of equalization shall certify the valuation to be used for all tax levies on or before the first Monday in August. The board shall communicate its equalization actions to the department, along with any recommendations for improved work practices of county assessors;

When in the opinion of the board, it would be of assistance in equalizing values under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the board may require any county assessor to furnish statements showing assessments of the property of any person within the county. The board shall consider and equalize county assessments under paragraph (ii) of this subsection and may increase or decrease assessments returned by the county board of equalization when the property so assessed appears to be over-valued or under-valued, first giving notice to those persons affected. The notice shall fix a time and place of hearing. Any affected person may appeal from the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the property is situated;

Decide all questions that may arise with reference to the construction of any statute affecting the assessment, levy and collection of taxes, in accordance with the rules, regulations, orders and instructions prescribed by the department:

Upon application of any person adversely affected; or

In performing its responsibilities to equalize values, including with respect to the suitability of the system prescribed by the department for establishing fair market value.

Require each county assessor immediately after the county boards of equalization have been notified by the state board of equalization of the amount of the county values and state levy, to certify to the state board of equalization, on or before August 10 of each year, in the form and detail prescribed by the board, all valuations and levies fixed in their respective counties;

Institute or cause to be instituted any proceedings, either civil or criminal, provided by law as a punishment for the neglect, failure or refusal to obey any lawful requirement or order by the board arising from a review of department action under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act or in performing its responsibilities to equalize values, or to prevent the violation or disobedience of any lawful requirement or order regarding appeal or equalization, or to compel their enforcement;

At the time of making annual assessment for state purposes, direct the boards of county commissioners of the several counties to levy upon all taxable property a tax sufficient to pay the interest on all state bonds for that year;

Hold hearings after due notice in the manner and form provided in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and its own rules and regulations of practice and procedure. The board may contract with an attorney licensed in the state of Wyoming to perform the functions of a presiding officer, provided the attorney is knowledgeable of and qualified in the particular areas of taxation which are the subject of the appeal;

Certify to the county boards of equalization the amount of levy for state purposes on or before the first Monday in August. Whenever the valuation of any county is changed by the state board of equalization, the officers of the county who have authority to levy taxes shall use the valuation as fixed by the state board of equalization as a basis for making tax levies for all purposes;

Carefully examine into all cases wherein it is alleged that property subject to taxation has not been assessed or has been fraudulently, improperly, or unequally assessed, or the law in any manner evaded or violated, and cause to be instituted proceedings which will remedy improper or negligent administration of the tax laws of the state. Except for allegations based in fraud, any request for relief under this paragraph shall be filed within five (5) years from the date the taxes were paid or should have been paid;

Require any public officer to report information relating to the assessment of property, collection of taxes, receipts from excises and other sources, and whatever other information the department or board may need in the form it prescribes;

Schedule meetings of the board at a fixed time on the first working day of each week, and all final actions or decisions by the board shall be made or ratified at such scheduled meetings;

Keep complete, accurate, written minutes of all meetings of the board and the actions taken;

Provide not less than twenty (20) days notice and an opportunity to be heard to the county board of equalization and the county assessor of any county or counties in which the taxable value of any class of property is to be increased or decreased;

Have the power to issue subpoenas. The board may issue a subpoena requiring any person to appear at a place within the county where the person resides designated in the subpoena and be examined about any matter within the scope of the inquiry, investigation or contested case being conducted by the board or department and requiring the production of any books and records. The district court shall upon a finding of good cause issue an order requiring the person to appear and to produce the necessary books and records in the event the person disregards or refuses to obey the subpoena of the board;

Promulgate rules and regulations governing procedures for board proceedings, including those related to its responsibility to equalize values, and its own internal affairs.

The governor may remove any member of the state board of equalization as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

On or before August 1 of each year, the state auditor shall certify to the board the amount of all appropriations made by the legislature of the state of Wyoming and the interest on the public debt for which a levy must be made.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 33, § 1; 2001, ch. 74, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 147, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to state board of equalization, see art. 15, §§ 9, 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in the second sentence of (a), substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “two (2).”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (c), added “The board shall also review final decisions of the department of transportation concerning the assessment or application of taxes authorized under this title upon application of any interested person adversely affected.”

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (c) added the second sentence.

This section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (c), added the third sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 33, § 1, amended W.S. 39-1-304, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments by ch. 33 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 state as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be
deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority,
board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments
in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after
the effective date of this act.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Management action team. —

Laws 1989, ch. 266, § 2, authorizes the governor to create a management team within the office of the governor to exercise certain authority within the department of revenue and taxation, to periodically report to the governor and the select tax administration oversight committee on progress and recommendations, and to provide a written report to the governor and the legislature.

Administrative agency has no authority to determine constitutionality of statute,

and this is so whether the question is the constitutionality of the statute per se or the constitutionality of the statute as applied. Belco Petroleum Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 587 P.2d 204,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1978), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Due process did not require contested case proceeding. —

Due process did not so clearly require a contested case proceeding for a petition filed under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-1-304(a)(xiv) (recodified at Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-11-102

.1(c)(x)), that a writ of mandamus should have issued to direct the state board of equalization to utilize such a proceeding after it had reviewed the petition in a regulatory proceeding which followed a ruling by the Wyoming Supreme Court that it had a duty to “carefully examine” the petition. 2001 WY 91, 33 P.3d 107,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 109

.

Counties have authority to file contested cases. —

Counties have authority to file contested cases from final decisions of the Wyoming Department of Revenue under §

39-11-102

.1(c); however, such appeal must be limited in scope to specific errors allegedly committed by the Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

Limits on right of counties to intervene. —

This section does not confer upon counties the requisite interest to intervene as of right into a contested case before the Wyoming Board of Equalization brought by a taxpayer against the Wyoming Department of Revenue challenging substantive methodology decisions by the Department regarding valuation. The Department erred by allowing the county to intervene in a deficiency dispute with a taxpayer since the county's interest was represented by the Department, and the county was unable to sue itself. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 89, 94 P.3d 430,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2004).

Board cannot decide point of valuation. —

The board would be infringing upon the administrative function specifically assigned to the department if it exercised jurisdiction to decide a petition for a declaration concerning the point of valuation to determine taxable valuation of oil and gas production. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 895 P.2d 464,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1995).

But state board had jurisdiction. —

A letter sent by the department of revenue to a taxpayer was a final determination as it communicated the department's final and conclusive decision concerning the allocation of production, and, therefore, the state board of equalization had subject matter jurisdiction to decide the issues presented in the appeal. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. Aug. 3, 2000).

Adversely affected. —

Court dismissed one of the taxpayer's consolidated appeals of the ad valorem personal property tax assessments on its coal mines for lack of jurisdiction because that the State Board of Equalization had remanded the case to the County Board of Equalization; therefore the taxpayer was the prevailing party and was not adversely affected as provided under this section, or ‘aggrieved’ as provided in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-13-109

and Wyo. R. App. P. 12.01. Even if the taxpayer's appeal from the State Board of Equalization to the district court was authorized, the district court's order remanding the matter to the County Board was not appealable under Wyo. R. App. P. 1.05 because it did not finally conclude the matter. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Campbell County, 2006 WY 44, 132 P.3d 801,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2006).

Change in valuation method not “rule.” —

Letters issued by the department of revenue and taxation to announce a change in the valuation method for calculating the severance tax on uranium ore did not constitute “rules” and therefore did not require adoption pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16). Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Section provides for revaluation. —

This section provides for revaluation when it directs the state board of equalization to discover errors or unequally assessed taxes and remedy those errors. 896 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 93

.

Reassessment protested on first statutorily provided occasion. —

A reassessment amount may be protested by the taxpayer, before the county and state board, on the first statutorily provided occasion available after the reassessment has occurred, even if during the next year, after the protest period has passed. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Authority to assess additional ad valorem taxes. —

The state has authority under this section to reopen prior certifications and assess additional ad valorem taxes on property that was undervalued. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n v. BHP Petroleum Co., 856 P.2d 428,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1993).

Settlement did not preclude reassessment. —

Settlement agreement between the state, the county and petroleum producer, which authorized the state alone to chose the value method for determining the producer's severance and ad valorem tax liability in future tax years, did not preclude the county from presenting allegations of unequal or improper assessment, thus triggering the broad power of the board of equalization to carefully examine the case. Exxon Corp. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 987 P.2d 158,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1999).

State Board exceeded its authority. —

The State Board of Equalization exceeded its statutory authority by adopting a rule which allowed the ad valorem tax exemption for only property which was required by the state or federal environmental protection agencies and by adopting a rule which did not allow the exemption for monitoring devices. 872 P.2d 1163,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 47

.

State Board of Equalization went beyond its statutory authority under Wyo. Stat. §

39-11-102

.1(c) when it determined that meters on an oil company's natural gas wells were “custody transfer meters” for purposes of severance tax valuation of other oil companies'
shares in the natural gas production from the wells, because the other oil companies were not “interested persons adversely affected” as required by the statute; the other oil companies did not appeal to the board and were therefore non-parties to the proceedings.
Exxon Mobil Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2011 WY 161, 266 P.3d 944,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2011).

Wyoming Board of Equalization acted outside its authority and without observance of the procedure required by law when it decided that the issue was not the amount that the taxpayer was entitled to deduct for a specific item but rather, whether it was entitled to any deduction at all. Solvay Chems., Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2018 WY 124, 430 P.3d 295,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2018).

Board may not usurp valuation function assigned to department. —

In reviewing final decision of department of revenue, board of equalization erred where it departed from its adjudicatory role and assumed function of prescribing system of establishing fair market value, which was statutorily assigned to department. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

Board of equalization not a proper party to appeal from its own order. —

Board of equalization functions in its adjudicatory capacity when it considers appeal from final decision of department of revenue, and when board acts in its adjudicatory capacity, it is not a proper party to an appeal from its own order. Antelope Valley Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 4 P.3d 876,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2000).

Pollution control equipment's operating costs not considered. —

The state board of equalization (now the department of revenue) correctly interprets §

35-11-1103

(property exempt from ad valorem taxation) by not considering operating costs in determining the amount of value of pollution control equipment for ad valorem taxation. General Chem. Corp. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 418,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1991).

Exhaustion of administrative remedies. —

Taxpayer was required to exhaust administrative remedies before bringing declaratory judgment action; constitutionally-established and statutorily-directed agency was proper forum for initial review of challenge to tax assessment. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 356,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1992).

Final decision. —

Annual value certification for ad valorem tax is not a final decision for purposes of §

39-11-102

.1(c); a decision is final only after the time for an audit has expired, or an audit is completed and the Wyoming Department of Revenue has assessed on the basis of the audit under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-208(b)(v)(E), and then an appeal may be made. Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp., 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002), reh'g denied,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. Nov. 5, 2002).

Quoted

in

Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991); Gray v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1347,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1995); Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Stated

in

Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State ex rel. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981)Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988); Town of Pine Bluffs v. Eisele, 2017 WY 117, 403 P.3d 126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel of state or local government in tax matters, 21 ALR4th 573.

§ 39-11-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

Property subject to taxation. All property within Wyoming is subject to taxation as provided by this act except as prohibited by the United States or Wyoming constitutions or expressly exempted by W.S.

39-11-105

;

Provisions for assessing tax. The board and department shall not compromise or reduce the tax liability of any person owing a tax to the state of Wyoming, except that the department for good cause, may, but is not required to, compromise and settle with the taxpayer for payment of any taxes owed to the state of Wyoming which tax liability is disputed in good faith by the taxpayer and which liability has not been settled in law. In case the department and the person owing the tax do not agree with respect to tax liability, the department shall by order, assess and levy the full amount of tax due and any person aggrieved by the assessment may appeal the decision to the board pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Basis of tax. There are no specific applicable provisions for the basis of tax for this chapter.

Taxpayer. There are no specific applicable provisions for the taxpayer for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative actions, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

All property subject to taxation. —

The legislature affirmed its intent to make all property subject to taxation, unless prohibited by law or expressly exempted, when it passed this section. Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996).

Before property can be locally taxed,

it must have become identified and incorporated with the general mass of property in the state. Syndicate Improvement Co. v. Bradley, 7 Wyo. 228, 51 P. 242,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 7 Wyo. 228, 51 P. 242,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1897).

Tax levied on oil production subsequently determined to befederal property. —

See Atlantic Richfield Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 569 P.2d 1267,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “State Authority to Tax Private Interests in Federal Property,” see 13 Wyo. L.J. 229 (1958).

For article, “An Analysis of Recent Tax Proposals in Wyoming,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What amounts to “reasonable cause” for failure to file or delay in filing tax return, 3 ALR2d 617.

Business situs of intangibles held in trust in state other than beneficiaries domicil, 59 ALR3d 837.

Property taxation of computer software, 82 ALR3d 606.

Sale price of real property as evidence in determining value for tax assessment purposes, 89 ALR3d 1126.

Situs of tangible personal property for purposes of property taxation, 2 ALR4th 432.

Situs of aircraft, rolling stock and vessels for purposes of property taxation, 3 ALR4th 837.

§ 39-11-104.
Taxation rate.

There are no specific applicable provisions for the taxation rate for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.